Louisiana, session 2026, HB473.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Articles 131, 132, and 136(A) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 131. Court to determine custody
In a proceeding for divorce or thereafter, the court shall award custody of a
child in accordance with the best interest of the child. There shall be a rebuttable
presumption that shared legal and physical custody is in the best interest of the child,
unless the court determines by clear and convincing evidence it is not feasible or in
the best interest of the child.
Art. 132. Award of custody to parents
If the parents agree who is to have custody, the court shall award custody in
accordance with their agreement unless the provisions of R.S. 9:364 apply or the best
interest of the child requires a different award. Subject to the provisions of R.S.
9:364, in the absence of agreement, or if the agreement is not in the best interest of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-473 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 473
the child, the court shall award shared legal and physical custody to the parents
jointly; however, if custody in one parent is shown by clear and convincing evidence
to serve the best interest of the child, the court shall award custody to that parent.
* * *
Art. 136. Award of visitation rights
A. Subject to R.S. 9:341 and 364, a parent not granted sole custody, shared
custody, or joint custody of a child is entitled to reasonable visitation rights unless
the court finds, after a hearing, that visitation would not be in the best interest of the
child.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 9:315.11(A)(1), 335(A)(1), (2)(b), and (3) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§315.11. Voluntarily unemployed or underemployed party
A.(1) If a party is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support
shall be calculated based on a determination of income earning potential, unless the
party is physically or mentally incapacitated, or is caring for a child of the parties
under the age of five years. In determining the party's income earning potential, the
court may consider the most recently published Louisiana Occupational Employment
Wage Survey. In determining whether to impute income to a party, the court's
considerations shall include, to the extent known, all of the following:
* * *
§335. Joint custody decree and implementation order; custody during an emergency
or disaster
A.(1) In a proceeding in which shared or joint custody is decreed, the court
shall render a shared or joint custody implementation order except for good cause
shown.
(2)
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-473 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 473
(b) Unless the court determines To the extent it is not feasible and or in the
best interest of the child, legal and physical custody of the children should shall be
shared equally.
* * *
(3) Unless the court determines it is not feasible or in the best interest of the
child, The the implementation order shall provide for the equal allocation of allocate
the legal authority and decision-making responsibility of between the parents.
* * *